test/src/gt-desc-yamls/noun-contracted_gt-desc.ana.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked

# Contracted syllable nouns belonging to SUOLU, SUOLULONG, FALIS, LASIS

Tests:
  Noun - guoru: # SUOLU
    guoru+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR+Cmp: guoro-
    guoru+N+Sg+Nom: guoru
    guoru+N+Sg+Gen: gurro
    guoru+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: gurrome
    guoru+N+Sg+Ill: gurrui
    guoru+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: gurruinan
    guoru+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1+Err/Orth: gurruinam
    guoru+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: gurruideameguin
    guoru+N+Pl+Com+Err/Orth+PxDu1: gurruineameguin
    guoru+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com: gurrožiin
    guoru+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: gurrožiinna

  Noun - njuovu: # SUOLULONG
    njuovu+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR+Cmp: njuovu-
    njuovu+N+Sg+Nom: njuovu
    njuovu+N+Sg+Gen: njuvvo
    njuovu+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: njuvvome
    njuovu+N+Sg+Ill: njuvvui
    njuovu+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: njuvvuinan
    njuovu+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1+Err/Orth: njuvvuinam
    njuovu+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: njuvvuideameguin
    njuovu+N+Pl+Com+Err/Orth+PxDu1: njuvvuineameguin
    njuovu+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com: njuvvožiin
    njuovu+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: njuvvožiinna

  Noun - olmmái: # FALIS
    olmmái+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR+Cmp: olmmái-
    olmmái+N+Sg+Nom: olmmái
    olmmái+N+Sg+Gen: olbmá
    olmmái+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: olbmáme
    olmmái+N+Sg+Ill: olbmái
    olmmái+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: olbmáinan
    olmmái+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1+Err/Orth: olbmáinam
    olmmái+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: olbmáideameguin
    olmmái+N+Pl+Com+Err/Orth+PxDu1: olbmáineameguin
    olmmái+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com: olbmážiin
    olmmái+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: olbmážiinna
    
  Noun - riekkis: # LASIS
    riekkis+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR+Cmp: riekkes-
    riekkis+N+Sg+Nom: riekkis
    riekkis+N+Sg+Gen: rieggá
    riekkis+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: rieggáme
    riekkis+N+Sg+Ill: rieggái
    riekkis+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: rieggáinan
    riekkis+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1+Err/Orth: rieggáinam
    riekkis+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: rieggáideameguin
    riekkis+N+Pl+Com+Err/Orth+PxDu1: rieggáineameguin
    riekkis+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com: rieggážiin
    riekkis+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: rieggážiinna
